Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.815

Surrender of weapons or licenses—Ensuring compliance—Information sharing.

For the purpose of assisting courts in ensuring compliance with an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order, the department of licensing, or the agency with responsibility for maintaining that information should it be an agency other than the department of licensing, shall make the following information available to prosecuting attorneys' offices, city attorneys' offices, public defender agency staff, probation services personnel, and judicial officers and staff of municipal, district, and superior courts for the following law enforcement purposes:

(1) Determining whether a person is ineligible to possess firearms;

(2) Determining a person's firearms purchase history; and

(3) Determining whether a person has or previously had a concealed pistol license, or has applied for a concealed pistol license.

[ 2021 c 215 s 76.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.